Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 25 CIGARETTE AND TOBACCO PRODUCTS TAXES
§ 63-2552. Tax imposed — Rate.

From and after July 1, 1972, there is levied and there shall be collected a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, or distribution of all tobacco products in this state at the rate of thirty-five per cent (35%) of the wholesale sales price of such tobacco products. Such tax shall be imposed at the time the distributor (a) brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from without the state tobacco products for sale, (b) makes, manufactures, or fabricates tobacco products in this state for sale in this state, or (c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state, to be sold by those retailers.

A floor stocks tax is hereby imposed upon every distributor of tobacco products at the rate of thirty-five per cent (35%) of the wholesale sales price of each tobacco product in his possession or under his control on July 1, 1972.

Each distributor, within twenty (20) days after July 1, 1972, shall file a report with the commission, in such form as the commission may prescribe, showing the tobacco products on hand on July 1, 1972, and the amount of tax due thereon.

The tax imposed by this subdivision shall be due and payable within twenty (20) days after July 1, 1972, and thereafter shall bear interest at the rate of one per cent (1%) per month.

§ 63-2552A. Additional tax imposed — Rate.

In addition to the tax imposed in section 63-2552, Idaho Code, from and after July 1, 1994, there is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, or distribution of all tobacco products in this state at the rate of five percent (5%) of the wholesale sales price of such tobacco products. Such tax shall be imposed at the time the distributor:

Brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from without the state tobacco products for sale;

Makes, manufactures, or fabricates tobacco products in this state for sale in this state; or

Ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state to be sold by those retailers.

Each distributor, within twenty (20) days after July 1, 1994, shall file a report with the commission, in such form as the commission may prescribe, showing the tobacco products on hand on July 1, 1994, and the amount of tax due thereon. The tax imposed in this subsection shall be due and payable within twenty (20) days after July 1, 1994, and thereafter shall bear interest at the rate of one percent (1%) per month.

Fifty percent (50%) of the tax collected pursuant to this section shall be subject to appropriation to the public school income fund to be utilized to develop and implement school safety improvements and to facilitate and provide substance abuse prevention programs in the public school system and the Idaho bureau of educational services for the deaf and the blind, less two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) that shall be remitted annually to the Idaho state police to increase toxicology lab capacity in the bureau of forensic services for drug testing of juveniles, and less eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) that shall be remitted to the commission on Hispanic affairs to be used for substance abuse prevention efforts in collaboration with the state department of education. Fifty percent (50%) of the tax collected pursuant to this section shall be subject to appropriation to the department of juvenile corrections for distribution quarterly to the counties to be utilized for county juvenile probation services, based upon the percentage the population of the county bears to the population of the state as a whole. The moneys remitted to the Idaho state police shall be reviewed annually and any money in excess to the operations needs of the laboratory for juvenile drug testing will be deposited in the public school income fund for substance abuse prevention programs in the public school system. The laboratory may utilize this increased toxicology capacity for adult drug testing to the extent that timely testing for juveniles is not adversely impacted.

§ 63-2552B. Tobacco products use tax.

Any person who does not hold a tobacco products tax permit who possesses, purchases or consumes tobacco products upon which tax imposed by this chapter has not been paid, including tobacco products sold by internet, catalog, telephone and facsimile sellers, is liable for the taxes imposed by sections 63-2552 and 63-2552A, Idaho Code, to be reported and paid as required in section 63-2560, Idaho Code.

§ 63-2553. Legislative intent.

It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to levy a tax on all tobacco products sold, used, consumed, handled, or distributed within this state and to collect the tax from the distributor as defined in section 63-2551[, Idaho Code]. It is the further intent and purpose of this chapter to impose the tax only once but nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt any person taxable under any other law or under any other tax imposed by the state of Idaho.

§ 63-2554. Permit required.

No person shall engage in the business of a distributor or subjobber of tobacco products at any place of business without first having received from the commission a permit as provided in section 63-2503 or 63-2504, Idaho Code.

§ 63-2555. Books and records to be preserved — Entry and inspection by commission.

Every distributor shall keep at each registered place of business complete and accurate records for that place of business, including itemized invoices, of tobacco products held, purchased, manufactured, brought in or caused to be brought in from without the state, or shipped or transported to retailers in this state, and of all sales of tobacco products made, except sales to the ultimate consumer.

These records shall show the names and addresses of purchasers, the inventory of all tobacco products on hand on July 1, 1972, and other pertinent papers and documents relating to the purchase, sale or disposition of tobacco products.

When a registered distributor sells tobacco products exclusively to the ultimate consumer at the address given in the certificate, no invoice of those sales shall be required, but itemized invoices shall be made of all tobacco products transferred to other retail outlets owned or controlled by that registered distributor. All books, records, and other papers and documents required by this section to be kept shall be preserved for a period of at least five (5) years after the date of the documents, as aforesaid, or the date of the entries thereof appearing in the records, unless the commission, in writing, authorizes their destruction or disposal at an earlier date. At any time during usual business hours, the commission, or its duly authorized agents or employees, may enter any place of business of a distributor, without a search warrant, and inspect the premises, the records required to be kept under this chapter, and the tobacco products contained therein, to determine whether or not all the provisions of this chapter are being fully complied with. If the commission, or any of its agents or employees, is denied free access or is hindered or interfered with in making such examination, the permit of the distributor at such premises shall be subject to revocation by the commission.

§ 63-2556. Preservation of invoices of sales to other than ultimate consumer.

Every person who sells tobacco products to persons other than the ultimate consumer shall render with each sale itemized invoices showing the seller’s name and address, the purchaser’s name and address, the date of sale, and all prices and discounts. He shall preserve legible copies of all such invoices for five (5) years from the date of sale.

§ 63-2557. Invoices of purchases to be procured by retailer, subjobber — Preservation — Inspection.

Every retailer and subjobber shall procure itemized invoices of all tobacco products purchased. The invoices shall show the name and address of the seller and the date of purchase. The retailer and subjobber shall preserve a legible copy of each such invoice for five (5) years from the date of purchase. Invoices shall be available for inspection by the commission or its authorized agents or employees at the retailer’s or subjobber’s place of business.

§ 63-2558. Records of shipments, deliveries from public warehouse of first destination — Preservation — Inspection.

Records of all deliveries or shipments of tobacco products from any public warehouse of first destination in this state shall be kept by the warehouse and be available to the commission for inspection. They shall show the name and address of the consignee, the date, the quantity of tobacco products delivered, and such other information as the commission may require. These records shall be preserved for five (5) years from the date of delivery of the tobacco products.

§ 63-2559. When credit may be obtained for tax paid.

Where tobacco products upon which the tax imposed by this chapter has been reported and paid, are shipped or transported by the distributor to distributors or retailers outside the state, to be sold by those distributors or retailers, or are returned to the manufacturer by the distributor or destroyed by the distributor, credit of such tax may be made to the distributor in accordance with rules prescribed by the commission.

Taxes paid on tobacco products sold on or after January 1, 2000, on accounts later found to be worthless and actually charged-off may be credited upon a subsequent payment of the tax on tobacco products or, if no such tax is due, refunded. If all or part of such an account is thereafter collected, the tax shall be paid based upon the proportion of the amount collected.

§ 63-2560. Tax payable monthly — Returns — Other than monthly returns — Procedure.

The taxes imposed hereunder shall be due and payable in monthly installments and remittance therefor shall be made on or before the twentieth day of the month next succeeding the end of the monthly period in which tax accrued. The taxpayer, on or before said twentieth day of said month, shall make out a return, upon such forms and setting forth such information as the tax commission may require, showing the amount of the tax for which he is liable for the preceding monthly period, and shall sign and transmit the same to the commission, together with a remittance for such amount in the form required.

The state tax commission may by rule provide returns for periods of time other than monthly periods. Returns for such reporting periods, together with payment of the required taxes, shall be due on or before the twentieth day of the month following the end of the period to which the return relates.

§ 63-2561. Title of act.

This act may be cited as the “Tobacco Products Tax Act.”

§ 63-2562. Additions and penalties.

The additions, penalties and requirements provided by the Idaho income tax act, sections 63-3046, 63-3075, 63-3076 and 63-3077, Idaho Code, shall apply in the same manner and to the same extent to this act as to the Idaho income tax act and shall cover acts, omissions, and delinquencies under the Idaho income tax act and such additions, penalties and requirements shall, for this purpose, be described and be for acts, omissions, delinquencies and requirements under the Idaho tobacco products tax act.

§ 63-2563. Collection and enforcement.

The collection and enforcement procedures provided by the Idaho income tax act, sections 63-3038, 63-3039, 63-3040, 63-3042 through 63-3045B, 63-3047 through 63-3065A, 63-3068, 63-3071, 63-3075 and 63-3078, Idaho Code, shall apply and be available to the state tax commission for the enforcement of this act and collection of any amounts due under this act and said sections shall, for this purpose, be considered part of this act and wherever liens or any other proceedings are defined as income tax liens or proceedings, they shall, when applied in enforcement or collection under this act, be described as tobacco products tax liens and proceedings. Any reference to taxable year in the income tax act shall be, for the purposes of this act, considered a taxable period.

The state tax commission may be made a party defendant in an action at law or in equity by any person aggrieved by the unlawful seizure or sale of his property, or in any suit for refund or to recover an overpayment, but only the state of Idaho shall be responsible for any final judgment secured against the state tax commission, and said judgment shall be paid or satisfied out of the tobacco products tax refund fund.

§ 63-2564. Distribution of tax revenues.

The revenues received from the taxes imposed by section 63-2552, Idaho Code, and any penalties, interest, or deficiency additions, shall be distributed by the tax commission as follows:

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account, sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the commission shall be paid through the state refund account, and those moneys are continuously appropriated.

From the balance remaining with the state treasurer after deducting the amounts in subsection (a) of this section, all remaining moneys shall be remitted directly to the general fund of the state of Idaho and shall be remitted to that fund periodically, but no less frequently than quarterly.

§ 63-2565. Refunds, limitations, interest.

Where there has been an overpayment of any tobacco products tax imposed by this act, the amount of such overpayment shall be credited against any tobacco products tax then due from the taxpayer, and any balance of such excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer.

The state tax commission is authorized and the state board of tax appeals is authorized to order the tax commission in proper cases to credit or remit, refund, and pay back all taxes and penalties erroneously or illegally assessed or collected, regardless of whether the same have been paid under protest, which claims for refund shall be certified to the state board of examiners by the state tax commission.

No such credit or refund of taxes, penalties or interest paid, shall be allowed or made after three (3) years from the time the return was filed, unless before the expiration of such period a claim therefor is filed by the taxpayer with the commission.

Interest shall be allowed on the amount of such credits or refunds at the rate provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, from the date such tax was paid.

Appeal of a tax commission decision denying in whole or part a claim for refund shall be made in accordance with and within the time limits prescribed in section 63-3049, Idaho Code.

§ 63-2531. Floor stocks tax. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2551. Tobacco products tax — Definitions.